Hawaii statutes.
§286-54 Out-of-state vehicle permit.
The owner of a motor vehicle which has been duly registered for the current
year in another state or country and in accordance with the laws thereof, may,
in lieu of registering the vehicle as otherwise required by this part, apply to
the director of finance for the registration thereof as provided in this
section.

The owner shall, within thirty days after
commencing to operate the vehicle or causing or permitting it to be operated
within the State, apply to the director of finance for the registration thereof
upon the appropriate official form stating therein the name and home address of
the owner and the temporary address, if any, of the owner while within the
State, the registration number of the vehicle as assigned thereto by the state
or country, together with a description of the motor vehicle that may be called
for in the form and other statements of facts that may be required by the
director of finance.

The director of finance shall file every
application received and register the vehicle therein described and shall issue
to the owner a registration certificate of a distinctive form containing the
date of its issue, a brief description of the vehicle, and a statement that the
owner has procured registration of the vehicle.

No owner of a motor vehicle which has been duly
registered for the current year in another state or country shall operate any
vehicle or cause or permit to be operated upon the public highways, either
before or while it is registered under this section, unless there is at all
times displayed thereon the current registration number plates assigned to the
vehicle by the other state or country, nor unless the certificate of
registration is kept within the vehicle for which it is registered, or in the
event the vehicle is a motorcycle, carry the certificate of registration in a
convenient receptacle attached to the vehicle. The director of finance shall
also furnish the owner with an emblem bearing a serial number with the words
"VEHICLE PERMIT" and the date of expiration of the emblem to be
placed on the rear bumper in plain sight of the vehicle, or when issued to a
motorcycle emblem to be placed on rear fender.

Every certificate of registration issued
pursuant to this section shall be valid for the unexpired portion of the
current license number plates assigned to the vehicle in accordance with the
law of the other state or country; provided that in no case shall a certificate
be issued to exceed a twelve-month period.

Whenever a vehicle is registered under this
section, the sum of $5 shall be assessed against the owner of the vehicle to
defray the administrative costs incurred by the county. Subsequent changes in
the amount of the administrative costs shall be established by the county's
legislative body. [L 1929, c 197, §10; RL 1935, §2673; RL 1945, §7344; RL 1955,
§160-12; am L 1963, c 23, §1; am L 1967, c 59, §1; HRS §286-54; am L 1971, c
67, §1; am L 1982, c 172, §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1988, c 312, §1; am L 1998, c
98, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next